District of Columbia statutes.
5-1108

Dismissal of complaint.

A complaint may be dismissed on the following grounds:

(1)

The complaint is deemed to lack merit;

(2)

The complainant refuses to cooperate with the investigation; or

(3)

If, after the Executive Director refers a complaint for mediation, the complainant willfully fails to participate in good faith in the mediation process.

History

Mar. 26, 1999, D.C. Law 12-208, § 9, 45 DCR 8107

Section References

This section is referenced in § 5-1109, § 5-1110, and § 5-1111.

Prior Codifications

1981 Ed., § 4-918.